Utah statutes.
63A-3-105.   Securities deposited with state treasurer -- Release.

(1)  The director of the Division of Finance shall collect and deposit with the state treasurer all stocks, evidences of indebtedness, bonds, and securities of every kind and nature belonging to the state or any of its departments.

(2)  The state treasurer shall keep a complete record of the items deposited under Subsection (1) and credit each to the proper fund or account.  The treasurer shall release the items only upon the order of the director.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 1993 General Session

